Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2604
Reading deficiency; identification.

(1) Any student in kindergarten, grade one, grade two, or grade three shall be identified as having a reading deficiency if such student performs below the threshold level determined pursuant to section 79-2603 on an approved reading assessment. A student who is identified as having a reading deficiency pursuant to this subsection shall remain identified as having a reading deficiency until the student performs at or above the threshold level on an approved reading assessment.

(2) Nothing in the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act shall prohibit a school district from identifying any other student as having a reading deficiency.

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 23.